Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1256
State capitol; possession of weapon or prohibited substance; acts prohibited; exceptions.

(1) For purposes of this section the definitions in section 28-1201 and the following definitions apply:

(a) Prohibited substance means explosive, incendiary, or other combustible devices; hazardous materials; or paint or spray paint; and

(b) Weapon means any:

(i) Firearm; or

(ii) Knife with a blade over three and one-half inches in length and which, in the manner it is used or intended to be used, is capable of producing death or serious bodily injury.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person shall not knowingly enter or attempt to enter the State Capitol while in possession of a weapon or prohibited substance.

(3) This section does not apply to:

(a) A person who has received prior approval from the Nebraska State Patrol;

(b) The possession of a weapon by a law enforcement officer, as defined in section 81-1401, who is acting in the course of his or her official duties;

(c) The carrying of a concealed handgun by a qualified law enforcement officer or qualified retired law enforcement officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 926B or 926C, respectively, as such sections existed on January 1, 2026; or

(d) The carrying of a concealed handgun by an individual holding a current and valid permit to carry a concealed handgun issued pursuant to the Concealed Handgun Permit Act.

Laws 2026, LB1237, § 2.
July 18, 2026
Concealed Handgun Permit Act, see section 69-2427.